Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1830.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 41-1728.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-1728.01. Turquoise alert system; requirements; definitions A. The department shall establish the turquoise alert system as a quick response system designed to issue and coordinate alerts following the report of a missing person. B. On the request of an authorized person at a law enforcement agency that is investigating a report of a missing person, the department shall request an activation of the emergency alert system and issue a turquoise alert if all of the following conditions are met: 1. The missing person is under sixty-five years of age. 2. The law enforcement agency investigating the missing person report: (a) Has used all available local resources. (b) Has determined that the person is a runaway, if the person is a child, has been kidnapped or has gone missing under unexplained or suspicious circumstances. (c) Believes that the missing person is in danger or that the missing person is in the company of a potentially dangerous person or that there are other factors indicating that the missing person may be in peril. 3. There is information available that, if disseminated to the public, could assist in the safe recovery of the missing person. 4. The department has been designated to use the federally authorized emergency alert system for the issuance of turquoise alerts. C. If the department issues a turquoise alert pursuant to this section, the department shall provide the turquoise alert information to any other entity that provides similar notifications in this state. D. The department shall issue a TURQUOISE alert whether or not the department has determined whether the missing person has been kidnapped or is a runaway, if the person is a child. D. E. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Law enforcement agency" means the Arizona department of public safety, a municipal police department, a county sheriff's office, a tribal law enforcement agency and or a federal law enforcement agency that operates within this state. 2. "Person" includes a member of a federally recognized Indian Tribe. END_STATUTE